Maine, session 132, LD1407.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §565-A, sub-§2 is enacted to read:
2. Indoor air quality standards. The board shall develop indoor air quality standards
for buildings in the State in which public sector workers work.
Sec. 2. 26 MRSA §565-A, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Rules. The board shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of subsection 2. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules under Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 3. Board of Occupational Safety and Health to develop indoor air
quality standards for public buildings in the State. In creating the indoor air quality
standards under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 26, section 565-A, subsection 2, the
Department of Labor, Board of Occupational Safety and Health shall consider but is not
limited to considering the following:
1. Carbon monoxide;
2. Nitrogen dioxide;
3. Indoor particulate matter;
4. Aerosolized particles;
5. Mold;
6. Volatile organic compounds;
7. Radon;
8. Lead;
9. Asbestos;
10. Pesticides;
11. Insecticides;
12. Formaldehyde; and
13. Excess humidity.
The board may consider the items listed in this section individually or create an indoor
air quality index. A rule for an item in this section that involves aerosols must be at least
as stringent as American Society of Heating, Refrigerating and Air-Conditioning Engineers
Standard 241 (2023).
Sec. 4. Rules to develop initial indoor air quality standards. By February 15,
2026, the Department of Labor, Board of Occupational Safety and Health shall publish a
notice of proposed rules under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 8053, subsection
5 to carry out the provisions of Title 26, section 565-A, subsection 2.